Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0084.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 13a. (1) As used in this section: (a) "Central furnace" means a self-contained, gas-burning appliance for heating air by transfer of heat of combustion through metal to the air, and designed to supply heated air through ducts to spaces remote from, or adjacent to, the appliance location. (b) "Clothes dryer" means a device used to dry wet laundry by means of heat derived from the combustion of fuel gases. (c) "Household cooking gas appliance" means a gas gas-burning appliance for domestic food preparation, providing any 1 or combination of the following: (i) Top or surface cooking. (ii) Oven cooking. (iii) Broiling. (2) The code shall must contain, as a part of the energy conservation provisions, 1 or more provisions prohibiting that prohibit the installation in a building or structure of any of the following new appliances which requires for its operation the use of a continuously burning pilot light: (a) A central furnace having an input rate of 225,000 BTU per hour or less. (b) A clothes dryer. (c) A household cooking gas appliance having an electrical supply cord. (3) The provisions of the code required by this section shall do not apply to any of the following: (a) A mobile home or modular home. (b) An appliance that is designed to burn exclusively liquefied petroleum gas. (c) An appliance which that meets the energy efficiency standards prescribed by the federal regulations promulgated pursuant to in accordance with the energy policy and conservation act, 42 U.S.C. USC 6201 to 6422. (4) The provisions of the code required by this section shall must be promulgated not later than 90 days after the effective date of this section.October 18, 1980. (5) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a local unit of government shall not adopt, maintain, or enforce an ordinance that prohibits the use of a gas-burning appliance in a new or existing commercial or residential building or structure.